da: Styrearmens position: Forrest (fremad); Nederst; Nederst forrest; Nederst bagest; Ikke relevant; Bagest (trukket); Øverst; Øverst forrest; Øverst bagest; Anden
sv: Styrarmens position: Fram (främre); Nedre; Nedre främre; Nedre bakre; Ej tillämpligt; Bak (bakre); Övre; Övre främre; Övre bakre; Annan
nb: Kontrollarmposisjon: Foran (fremre); Nedre; Nedre foran; Nedre bak; Ikke aktuelt; Bak (langsgående); Øvre; Øvre foran; Øvre bak; Annet
en: Control arm position: Front (forward); Lower; Lower front; Lower rear; Not applicable; Rear (trailing); Upper; Upper front; Upper rear; Other
bg-BG: Позиция на носача: Отпред (преден); Долен; Долен преден; Долен заден; Неприложимо; Отзад (заден); Горен; Горен преден; Горен заден; Друга
it: Posizione del braccio di controllo: Anteriore (frontale); Inferiore; Inferiore anteriore; Inferiore posteriore; Non applicabile; Posteriore (longitudinale); Superiore; Superiore anteriore; Superiore posteriore; Altro
lt-LT: Valdymo svirties padėtis: Priekinė (priešakinė); Apatinė; Apatinė priekinė; Apatinė galinė; Netaikoma; Galinė (velkamoji); Viršutinė; Viršutinė priekinė; Viršutinė galinė; Kita
vi: Vị trí cần điều khiển: Trước (phía trước); Dưới; Trước dưới; Sau dưới; Không áp dụng; Sau (kéo theo); Trên; Trước trên; Sau trên; Khác
zh-TW: 控制臂位置: 前方 (向前); 下方; 前下方; 後下方; 不適用; 後方 (拖曳); 上方; 前上方; 後上方; 其他
ko: 컨트롤 암 위치: 전면(앞쪽); 하부; 전면 하부; 후면 하부; 해당 없음; 후면(트레일링); 상부; 전면 상부; 후면 상부; 기타
ja: コントロールアームの位置: フロント (前方); ロア; ロアフロント; ロアリア; 該当なし; リア (トレーリング); アッパー; アッパーフロント; アッパーリア; その他
es: Posición del brazo de control: Delantero (hacia adelante); Inferior; Inferior delantero; Inferior trasero; No aplicable; Trasero (arrastre); Superior; Superior delantero; Superior trasero; Otro
ru: Положение рычага подвески: Спереди (продольный); Нижний; Нижний передний; Нижний задний; Неприменимо; Сзади (продольный); Верхний; Верхний передний; Верхний задний; Другое
de: Position des Querlenkers: Vorne (vordere); Unten; Unten vorne; Unten hinten; Nicht zutreffend; Hinten (hintere); Oben; Oben vorne; Oben hinten; Sonstige
pt-BR: Posição do braço de controle: Dianteira (avançada); Inferior; Inferior dianteira; Inferior traseira; Não se aplica; Traseira; Superior; Superior dianteira; Superior traseira; Outro
tr: Salıncak kolunun konumu: Ön (ileri); Alt; Alt ön; Alt arka; Geçerli değil; Arka (çekme); Üst; Üst ön; Üst arka; Diğer
sk-SK: Poloha ovládacieho ramena: Predné (vpredu); Spodné; Spodné predné; Spodné zadné; Neaplikovateľné; Zadné (vlečené); Horné; Horné predné; Horné zadné; Iné
hu: Lengőkar pozíciója: Elülső (első); Alsó; Alsó elülső; Alsó hátsó; Nem értelmezhető; Hátsó (követő); Felső; Felső elülső; Felső hátsó; Egyéb
fi: Tukivarren asento: Etu (etummainen); Alempi; Alaetu; Alataka; Ei sovellu; Taka (pitkittäinen); Ylempi; Yläetu; Ylätaka; Muu
sl-SI: Položaj krmilne ročice: Spredaj (naprej); Spodaj; Spodaj spredaj; Spodaj zadaj; Ni primerno; Zadaj (vlečno); Zgoraj; Zgoraj spredaj; Zgoraj zadaj; Drugo
hr-HR: Položaj upravljačke ruke: Sprijeda (naprijed); Donji dio; Donji prednji dio; Donji stražnji dio; Nije primjenjivo; Straga (prateće); Gornji dio; Gornji prednji dio; Gornji stražnji dio; Ostalo
nl: Regelarm positie: Voor (naar voren gericht); Onder; Onder voor; Onder achter; Niet van toepassing; Achter (trailing); Boven; Boven voor; Boven achter; Overig
zh-CN: 控制臂位置: 前（前向）; 下; 前下; 后下; 不适用; 后（拖曳）; 上; 前上; 后上; 其他
el: Θέση βραχίονα ελέγχου: Μπροστά (εμπρόσθιο); Κάτω; Κάτω μπροστά; Κάτω πίσω; Δεν ισχύει; Πίσω (διαμήκες); Επάνω; Επάνω μπροστά; Επάνω πίσω; Άλλο
fr: Position du bras de suspension: Avant (vers l'avant); Inférieur; Avant inférieur; Arrière inférieur; Non applicable; Arrière (tirant); Supérieur; Avant supérieur; Arrière supérieur; Autre
th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้งของปีกนก: ด้านหน้า (ส่วนหน้า); ด้านล่าง; ด้านหน้าล่าง; ด้านหลังล่าง; ไม่มี; ด้านหลัง (ส่วนท้าย); ด้านบน; ด้านหน้าบน; ด้านหลังบน; อื่นๆ
pl: Położenie wahacza: Przód (przedni); Dolna; Dolna przednia; Dolna tylna; Nie dotyczy; Tył (wleczony); Górna; Górna przednia; Górna tylna; Inna
pt-PT: Posição do braço de controlo: Dianteiro (para a frente); Inferior; Inferior dianteiro; Inferior traseiro; Não aplicável; Traseiro (longitudinal); Superior; Superior dianteiro; Superior traseiro; Outra
cs: Poloha příčného ramene: Přední; Spodní; Spodní přední; Spodní zadní; Nelze použít; Zadní (vlečené); Horní; Horní přední; Horní zadní; Jiné
ro-RO: Poziția brațului de control: Față (anterior); Inferior; Inferior față; Inferior spate; Nu se aplică; Spate (posterior); Superior; Superior față; Superior spate; Altele